Louisiana, session 2026, SB271.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:387.9.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§387.9.2. Special permits; vehicles hauling grain or cotton; authorization to
travel upon segment of Interstate 20 as an alternate route to US
80
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and provided
that there are no objections raised by the federal government, the secretary
shall issue special permits to persons who own or operate vehicles which haul
cotton and grain. The Department of Transportation and Development shall
provide administrative rules which limit permits issued pursuant to this Section
to harvest season operations and provide necessary weight limits and
procedures to comply with federal requirements and laws. Any vehicle issued
a special permit pursuant to this Section may travel upon that segment of
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-575 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 271
Interstate 20 between its interchange with US 165 in the city of Monroe and its
interchange with LA 193 in Delta, Louisiana, as an alternate route to US 80.